Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1444
State elective office, defined.

State elective office shall mean the office of Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Auditor of Public Accounts, State Treasurer, Attorney General, member of a board or commission with one or more election districts of more than one county, and member of the Legislature.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 44.